Montana, session 2025, SB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. State procurement of opioid overdose medication. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (2), after June 30, 2025, state funds or available federal funding may not be used to
purchase opioid antagonists from a person that was a party to or an affiliate or subsidiary of a person that was
a party to a settlement with a state due to its role in the manufacture, sale, or distribution of prescription opioids.
(2) The prohibition in subsection (1) does not apply to a person with a state contract to provide
opioid antagonists to the state executed before July 1, 2025, until the fulfillment of the terms of the state
contract. A state contract described under this subsection may not be renewed after June 30, 2025.
(3) A person that agreed to provide the state with opioid antagonists as part of a settlement
entered into prior to September 1, 2024, shall continue to provide the state with opioid antagonists until the
terms of the settlement with the state are fulfilled.
(4) As used in this section, "opioid antagonist" has the same meaning as provided in 50-32-603.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 18, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 18, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 112